Hawaii statutes.
§210D-3 Hawaii community-based economic
development technical and financial assistance program. There is
established the Hawaii community-based economic development technical and
financial assistance program, placed within the department. [L 1990, c 111, pt
of §2; am L 1996, c 192, §4]

Note

Study on feasibility of a reentry academy for training and
entrepreneurial resources (RAFTER) for prison inmates; report to 2017
legislature. L 2016, c 227, §§3 to 5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next